Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5842.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 60108. (1) The Michigan geological survey may receive money or other assets to implement this part from any of the following: (a) Funds appropriated by the legislature. (b) Federal, state, municipal, or private grants. (c) Any other source approved by the governing institution. (2) To support the critical functions of the Michigan geological survey that benefit the entire state, the legislature shall annually appropriate sufficient funds to the Michigan geological survey to carry out the responsibilities under section 60104. The amount of funding appropriated under this subsection must not be less than the amount appropriated to the Michigan geological survey for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2025.